Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.051

Publication of chapter—Distribution.

The director may publish a copy of this chapter and information relative to the enforcement of this chapter and may mail a copy of this chapter and the information to each licensed broker, managing broker, and firm.

[ 2008 c 23 s 27; 1997 c 322 s 16; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 18; 1953 c 235 s 10; 1947 c 203 s 8; 1941 c 252 s 27; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-50. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 22. Formerly RCW 18.85.210.]